District of Columbia statutes.
34-1201

Repealed

Purpose.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 2, 29 DCR 2872
Oct. 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-36, § 3(1), 30 DCR 4289
Nov. 15, 1983, D.C. Law 5-42, § 4(a), 30 DCR 4999
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334
1981 Ed., § 43-1801.
For temporary (225 day) extension of the term of the franchise of District Cablevision Limited Partnership, see §§ 2 to 8 of the Approval of the Extension of the Term of District Cablevision Limited Partnership Franchise Temporary Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-142, June 13, 2001, law notification 47 DCR 6092).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Approval of the Extension of the Term of Comcast Cablevision of the District, LLC’s Franchise Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-12, July 10, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 6588).
For temporary (90-day) authorization of extension of cable franchise term, see §§ 2 through 4 of the Approval of the Extension of the Term of District Cablevision Limited Partnership Franchise in the District of Columbia Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-314, April 17, 2000, 47 DCR 2847).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see §§ 2 through 10 of the Approval of the Application for Transfer of the Franchise and the Cable Television System of District Cablevision Limited Partnership From AT&T Broadband, LLC to Comcast Cablevision, LLC Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-503, December 28, 2000, 48 DCR 445).
For temporary (90 day) extension of cable franchise term, see § 2 of Approval of the Extension of the Term of Comcast Cablevision of the District, LLC’s, Franchise Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-23, March 21, 2001, 48 DCR 3309).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3 of Cable Television Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-409, July 15, 2002, 49 DCR 7280).

Appropriations authorized: Public Law 104-194, 110 Stat. 2363, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1997, provided for the Cable Television Enterprise Fund, established by § 43-1801 et seq., $2,511,000 and 8 full-time equivalent positions (including $2,179,000 and 8 full-time equivalent positions from local funds and $332,000 from other funds).

Sections 2 through 6 of D.C. Law 13-211 approved the application for the transfer of the stock of District Cablevision, Inc., the general partner of District Cablevision Limited Partnership, a cable television system franchisee in the District of Columbia, to AT Corporation.

Sections 601 through 610 of D.C. Law 13-308 approved the application for transfer of the franchise and the Cable Television System of District Cablevision Limited Partnership from AT Broadband to Comcast Cablevision.